HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 52 N 697
SFX 52 0 mek .
SFX 52 0 megiň .
SFX 52 0 mäge .
SFX 52 0 megi .
SFX 52 0 mekde .
SFX 52 0 mekden .
SFX 52 0 mezlik .
SFX 52 0 mezligiň .
SFX 52 0 mezlige .
SFX 52 0 mezligi .
SFX 52 0 mezlikde .
SFX 52 0 mezlikden .
SFX 52 0 megindäki .
SFX 52 0 megindäkiniň .
SFX 52 0 megindäkä .
SFX 52 0 megindäkini .
SFX 52 0 megindäkide .
SFX 52 0 megindäkiden .
SFX 52 e äýin .
SFX 52 0 mäýin .
SFX 52 0 me .
SFX 52 0 sin .
SFX 52 0 mesin .
SFX 52 e äliň .
SFX 52 e mäliň .
SFX 52 e äň .
SFX 52 e mäň .
SFX 52 0 sinler .
SFX 52 0 mesinler .
SFX 52 e äýeýin .
SFX 52 0 mäýeýin .
SFX 52 e äý .
SFX 52 0 mäý .
SFX 52 e äýsin .
SFX 52 0 mäýsin .
SFX 52 e äýeliň .
SFX 52 0 mäýeliň .
SFX 52 e äýiň .
SFX 52 0 mäýiň .
SFX 52 e äýsinler .
SFX 52 0 mäýsinler .
SFX 52 0 mezinden .
SFX 52 0 megim .
SFX 52 0 mezligim .
SFX 52 0 megimiň .
SFX 52 0 mezligimiň .
SFX 52 0 megime .
SFX 52 0 mezligime .
SFX 52 0 megimi .
SFX 52 0 mezligimi .
SFX 52 0 megimde .
SFX 52 0 mezligimde .
SFX 52 0 megimden .
SFX 52 0 mezligimden .
SFX 52 0 megiň .
SFX 52 0 mezligiň .
SFX 52 0 megiňe .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňe .
SFX 52 0 megiňi .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňi .
SFX 52 0 megiňde .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňde .
SFX 52 0 megiňden .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňden .
SFX 52 0 megi .
SFX 52 0 mezligi .
SFX 52 0 meginiň .
SFX 52 0 mezliginiň .
SFX 52 0 megine .
SFX 52 0 mezligine .
SFX 52 0 megini .
SFX 52 0 mezligini .
SFX 52 0 meginde .
SFX 52 0 mezliginde .
SFX 52 0 meginden .
SFX 52 0 mezliginden .
SFX 52 0 megimiz .
SFX 52 0 mezligimiz .
SFX 52 0 megimiziň .
SFX 52 0 mezligimiziň .
SFX 52 0 megimize .
SFX 52 0 mezligimize .
SFX 52 0 megimizi .
SFX 52 0 mezligimizi .
SFX 52 0 megimizde .
SFX 52 0 mezligimizde .
SFX 52 0 megimizden .
SFX 52 0 mezligimizden .
SFX 52 0 megiňiz .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňiz .
SFX 52 0 megiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 megiňize .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňize .
SFX 52 0 megiňizi .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňizi .
SFX 52 0 megiňizde .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňizde .
SFX 52 0 megiňizden .
SFX 52 0 mezligiňizden .
SFX 52 0 mekleri .
SFX 52 0 mezlikleri .
SFX 52 0 mekleriniň .
SFX 52 0 mezlikleriniň .
SFX 52 0 meklerize .
SFX 52 0 mezliklerine .
SFX 52 0 meklerini .
SFX 52 0 mezliklerini .
SFX 52 0 meklerinde .
SFX 52 0 mezliklerinde .
SFX 52 0 meklerinden .
SFX 52 0 mezliklerinden .
SFX 52 0 melidirin .
SFX 52 0 melisiň .
SFX 52 0 melidir .
SFX 52 0 melidiris .
SFX 52 0 melisiňiz .
SFX 52 0 melidirler .
SFX 52 0 melidigi .
SFX 52 0 melidiginiň .
SFX 52 0 melidigine .
SFX 52 0 melidigini .
SFX 52 0 melidiginde .
SFX 52 0 melidiginden .
SFX 52 0 meli .
SFX 52 0 jekdigim .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigim .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimiň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimiň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigime .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigime .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimi .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimi .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimde .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimden .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňe .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňe .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňi .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňi .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňde .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňden .
SFX 52 0 jekdigi .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigi .
SFX 52 0 jekdiginiň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiginiň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigine .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigine .
SFX 52 0 jekdigini .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigini .
SFX 52 0 jekdiginde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiginde .
SFX 52 0 jekdiginden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiginden .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimiz .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimiz .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimiziň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimiziň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimize .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimize .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimizi .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimizi .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimizde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimizde .
SFX 52 0 jekdigimizden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigimizden .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňiz .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňiz .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňize .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňize .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňizi .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňizi .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňizde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňizde .
SFX 52 0 jekdigiňizden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdigiňizden .
SFX 52 0 jekdikleri .
SFX 52 0 mejekdikleri .
SFX 52 0 jekdikleriniň .
SFX 52 0 mejekdikleriniň .
SFX 52 0 jekdiklerine .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiklerine .
SFX 52 0 jekdiklerini .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiklerini .
SFX 52 0 jekdiklerinde .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiklerinde .
SFX 52 0 jekdiklerinden .
SFX 52 0 mejekdiklerinden .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňiz .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňize .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňizi .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňizde .
SFX 52 0 meýänligiňizden .
SFX 52 e än .
SFX 52 0 medik .
SFX 52 0 ýän .
SFX 52 0 meýän .
SFX 52 0 jek .
SFX 52 0 mejek .
SFX 52 0 mänkäm .
SFX 52 0 mänkäň .
SFX 52 0 mänkä .
SFX 52 0 mänkäk .
SFX 52 0 mänkäňiz .
SFX 52 0 mänkäler .
SFX 52 0 sem .
SFX 52 0 mesem .
SFX 52 0 seň .
SFX 52 0 meseň .
SFX 52 0 se .
SFX 52 0 mese .
SFX 52 0 sek .
SFX 52 0 mesek .
SFX 52 0 seňiz .
SFX 52 0 meseňiz .
SFX 52 0 seler .
SFX 52 0 meseler .
SFX 52 e äýsem .
SFX 52 0 mäýsem .
SFX 52 e äýseň .
SFX 52 0 mäýseň .
SFX 52 e äýse .
SFX 52 0 mäýse .
SFX 52 e äýsek .
SFX 52 0 mäýsek .
SFX 52 e äýseňiz .
SFX 52 0 mäýseňiz .
SFX 52 e äýseler .
SFX 52 0 mäýseler .
SFX 52 0 ýärin .
SFX 52 0 meýärin .
SFX 52 0 ýärsiň .
SFX 52 0 meýärsiň .
SFX 52 0 ýär .
SFX 52 0 meýär .
SFX 52 0 ýäris .
SFX 52 0 meýäris .
SFX 52 0 ýärsiňiz.
SFX 52 0 meýärsiňiz.
SFX 52 0 ýärler .
SFX 52 0 meýärler .
SFX 52 e äýerin .
SFX 52 0 mäýerin .
SFX 52 e äýersiň .
SFX 52 0 mäýersiň .
SFX 52 e äýer .
SFX 52 0 mäýer .
SFX 52 e äýeris .
SFX 52 0 mäýeris .
SFX 52 e äýersiňiz.
SFX 52 0 mäýersiňiz.
SFX 52 e äýerler .
SFX 52 0 mäýerler .
SFX 52 0 dim .
SFX 52 0 medim .
SFX 52 0 diň .
SFX 52 0 mediň .
SFX 52 0 di .
SFX 52 0 medi .
SFX 52 0 dik .
SFX 52 0 medik .
SFX 52 0 diňiz .
SFX 52 0 mediňiz .
SFX 52 0 diler .
SFX 52 0 mediler .
SFX 52 e äýdim .
SFX 52 e äýdiň .
SFX 52 e äýdi .
SFX 52 e äýdik .
SFX 52 e äýdiňiz .
SFX 52 e äýdiler .
SFX 52 e ärin .
SFX 52 0 merin .
SFX 52 e ärsiň .
SFX 52 0 mersiň .
SFX 52 e är .
SFX 52 0 mez .
SFX 52 e äris .
SFX 52 0 meris .
SFX 52 e ärsiňiz .
SFX 52 0 mersiňiz .
SFX 52 e ärler .
SFX 52 0 mezler .
SFX 52 0 mäň .
SFX 52 0 meziň .
SFX 52 0 meze .
SFX 52 0 mezi .
SFX 52 0 mezde .
SFX 52 0 mezden .
SFX 52 0 mändigi .
SFX 52 0 mändiginiň .
SFX 52 0 mändigine .
SFX 52 0 mändigini .
SFX 52 0 mändiginde .
SFX 52 0 mändiginden .
SFX 52 0 mänligi .
SFX 52 0 mänliginiň .
SFX 52 0 mänligine .
SFX 52 0 mänligini .
SFX 52 0 mänliginde .
SFX 52 0 mänliginden .
SFX 52 e äniň .
SFX 52 e äniňe .
SFX 52 e äniňi .
SFX 52 e äniňde .
SFX 52 e äniňden .
SFX 52 e äp .
SFX 52 0 män .
SFX 52 0 semdim .
SFX 52 0 sedim .
SFX 52 0 mesedim .
SFX 52 0 sediň .
SFX 52 0 mesediň .
SFX 52 0 sedi .
SFX 52 0 mesedi .
SFX 52 0 sedik .
SFX 52 0 mesedik .
SFX 52 0 sediňiz .
SFX 52 0 mesediňiz .
SFX 52 0 sediler .
SFX 52 0 mesediler .
SFX 52 e ärdim .
SFX 52 e ärdiň .
SFX 52 e ärdi .
SFX 52 e ärdik .
SFX 52 e ärdiňiz .
SFX 52 e ärdiler .
SFX 52 0 mezdim .
SFX 52 0 mezdiň .
SFX 52 0 mezdi .
SFX 52 0 mezdik .
SFX 52 0 mezdiňiz .
SFX 52 0 mezdiler .
SFX 52 0 ýiş .
SFX 52 0 ýşiň .
SFX 52 0 ýşe .
SFX 52 0 ýşi .
SFX 52 0 ýişde .
SFX 52 0 ýişden .
SFX 52 0 ýşim .
SFX 52 0 ýşimiň .
SFX 52 0 ýşime .
SFX 52 0 ýşimi .
SFX 52 0 ýşimde .
SFX 52 0 ýşimden .
SFX 52 0 ýşiň .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňe .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňi .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňde .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňden .
SFX 52 0 ýşi .
SFX 52 0 ýşiniň .
SFX 52 0 ýşine .
SFX 52 0 ýşini .
SFX 52 0 ýşinde .
SFX 52 0 ýşinden .
SFX 52 0 ýşimiz .
SFX 52 0 ýşimiziň .
SFX 52 0 ýşimize .
SFX 52 0 ýşimizi .
SFX 52 0 ýşimizde .
SFX 52 0 ýşimizden .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňiz .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňiziň .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňize .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňizi .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňizde .
SFX 52 0 ýşiňizden .
SFX 52 0 ýişleri .
SFX 52 0 ýişleriniň .
SFX 52 0 ýişlerine .
SFX 52 0 ýişlerini .
SFX 52 0 ýişlerinde .
SFX 52 0 ýişlerinden .
SFX 52 e äbilsem .
SFX 52 0 mäbilsem .
SFX 52 e äbilseň .
SFX 52 0 mäbilseň .
SFX 52 e äbilse .
SFX 52 0 mäbilse .
SFX 52 e äbilsek .
SFX 52 0 mäbilsek .
SFX 52 e äbilseňiz .
SFX 52 0 mäbilseňiz .
SFX 52 e äbilseler .
SFX 52 0 mäbilseler .
SFX 52 e ändir .
SFX 52 e äniň .
SFX 52 0 medigiň .
SFX 52 0 ýäniň .
SFX 52 0 meýäniň .
SFX 52 0 jegiň .
SFX 52 0 mejegiň .
