HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
abstragirle/52
adaptirle/52
adresle/52
agitirle/52
analizle/52
anneksirle/52
appelirle/52
aprobirle/52
assimilirle/52
awansirle/52
awtomatizirle/52
balansirle/52
ballotirle/52
balzamirle/52
beke/52
bekle/52
belgile/52
belle/52
bellikle/52
bentle/52
berçinle/52
berke/52
berkle/52
besle/52
beterle/52
beze/52
bälçire/52
bintle/52
blokirle/52
bökde/52
bökjekle/52
bölekle/52
böwe/52
böwşeňle/52
bükgülde/52
bürkülde/52
çekiçle/52
çemçele/52
çemmerle/52
çenle/52
çerme/52
çeýne/52
çigrekle/52
çintge/52
çişle/52
çitikle/52
çöşle/52
çöwşüle/52
çüfle/52
çümşülde/52
çürke/52
çüýle/52
debse/52
deklarirle/52
deňle/52
depeşekle/52
depirjikle/52
depre/52
derjire/52
derňe/52
dertle/52
däbşekle/52
dälire/52
dänjire/52
digdenekle/52
digirde/52
dikgirde/52
dilimle/52
diňle/52
dire/52
dişle/52
dökünle/52
döre/52
dörje/52
döwümle/52
dükürde/52
düňkülde/52
dürrele/52
dürtekle/52
dürtükle/52
düşle/52
düwmele/52
düwürtikle/52
düýne/52
düýrle/52
düýşürge/52
ebşirle/52
egle/52
ejizle/52
ekspluatirle/52
eksportirle/52
ele/52
elewre/52
elle/52
emgekle/52
emle/52
ente/52
entre/52
eňşe/52
erbetle/52
erňekle/52
etekle/52
eýele/52
eýesire/52
ädimle/52
äsle/52
filtrle/52
geňle/52
gerekle/52
germe/52
gezmele/52
gäwşe/52
gäzle/52
gije/52
giňle/52
gölele/52
gönüle/52
göterimle/52
götinle/52
göwşülde/52
gözele/52
gözetle/52
gübürde/52
güjükle/52
güžžülde/52
gülümjire/52
gümmezekle/52
gümpülde/52
güneşle/52
günäle/52
güple/52
gürle/52
gürrülde/52
güsürde/52
gütürde/52
güwwülde/52
güýme/52
güzle/52
güzzülde/52
hekgilde/52
heläkle/52
henekle/52
hezzetle/52
hikirde/52
hödürle/52
höltülde/52
höwürtgele/52
hümmürde/52
hüňürde/52
hürsekle/52
hütürde/52
hüýle/52
içle/52
idegle/52
ide/52
igele/52
ikile/52
ikirjiňle/52
ilte/52
inçele/52
inde/52
inspektirle/52
instsenirle/52
inwentarizirle/52
iňirde/52
iňňilde/52
ionizirle/52
irle/52
işle/52
itele/52
iýmle/52
izzilde/52
jedirde/52
jägilde/52
jibirde/52
jikgilde/52
jiňkilde/52
jögüsire/52
jümşülde/52
jürle/52
jüýgülde/52
kebelekle/52
kekeçle/52
keleple/52
keme/52
kerçele/52
kereple/52
kesekle/52
kesgitle/52
keşdele/52
ketewle/52
keýşikle/52
käkele/52
kätmenle/52
käýinjire/52
kikirde/52
kirişle/52
kişçikle/52
kitirde/52
kompresle/52
köje/52
kökle/52
köpbilmişsire/52
köple/52
köpükle/52
köre/52
kössekle/52
köşe/52
köwejekle/52
köwle/52
köze/52
küjüle/52
kükre/52
külterle/52
kümşülde/52
küpürse/52
kürrele/52
küýse/52
leňkilde/52
lälirge/52
limitle/52
lisenzirle/52
lükgele/52
meňze/52
mesirge/52
mäjerle/52
mäle/52
mize/52
modernizle/52
mönsüre/52
möwke/52
mübärekle/52
müňkülde/52
müýnürge/52
nemjire/52
neýle/52
näziksire/52
niýetle/52
okkupirle/52
öde/52
ökdele/52
ölle/52
öňürdikle/52
örküçle/52
örte/52
öwhülde/52
öýkele/52
paketle/52
peleseňle/52
peltekle/52
pentle/52
pesle/52
petdele/52
petile/52
petre/52
päkle/52
pisle/52
pişgele/52
pitikle/52
pitre/52
pökle/52
pösürde/52
pöwhülde/52
propagandirle/52
pürdele/52
pürepürle/52
radiofisirle/52
reagirle/52
redusirle/52
reglamentirle/52
rejele/52
remilitarizirle/52
reňkle/52
repetirle/52
restawrirle/52
rezerwirle/52
seçekle/52
selçeňle/52
selkilde/52
se/52
seme/52
semre/52
seňňerle/52
seňsele/52
seple/52
serginle/52
serme/52
seýikle/52
seýrekle/52
sifrle/52
silke/52
siltele/52
siltenjire/52
simle/52
sintenjire/52
siwilizle/52
sölpülde/52
söwedeňle/52
söýgetle/52
söýünjile/52
sübçele/52
südürle/52
sülpülde/52
sünnetle/52
sürgüçle/52
sürpe/52
süssenekle/52
süýke/52
süýre/52
süzülwire/52
şerebele/52
şifrle/52
şildire/52
şinele/52
şüdügärle/52
tebsire/52
tekizle/52
telegrafirle/52
te/52
tente/52
terbiýele/52
ternele/52
teswirle/52
täzele/52
tigirle/52
tikenekle/52
tiňňirde/52
tirle/52
tisginjire/52
töle/52
töwerekle/52
transkribirle/52
tüfle/52
tümmekle/52
türgenle/52
tüssele/52
tüýkülikle/52
üçle/52
üfle/52
ülňüle/52
ümezle/52
ümürle/52
üpjünle/52
üşe/52
üwe/52
üýtge/52
ýegdekle/52
ýekele/52
ýeldirge/52
ýelekle/52
ýelinle/52
ýeljikle/52
ýelme/52
ýe/52
ýempe/52
ýeňle/52
ýepbeşle/52
ýeteňkirle/52
ýitile/52
ýöňke/52
ýörmele/52
ýöwselle/52
ýülme/52
zerle/52
zeýrenjire/52
zäkle/52
ziňkilde/52
